Washington statutes.
RCW 9A.60.010

Definitions.

*** CHANGE IN 2025 *** (SEE 1205-S.SL) ***

The following definitions and the definitions of RCW 9A.56.010 are applicable in this chapter unless the context otherwise requires:

(1) "Complete written instrument" means one which is fully drawn with respect to every essential feature thereof;

(2) "Incomplete written instrument" means one which contains some matter by way of content or authentication but which requires additional matter in order to render it a complete written instrument;

(3) To "falsely alter" a written instrument means to change, without authorization by anyone entitled to grant it, a written instrument, whether complete or incomplete, by means of erasure, obliteration, deletion, insertion of new matter, transposition of matter, or in any other manner;

(4) To "falsely complete" a written instrument means to transform an incomplete written instrument into a complete one by adding or inserting matter, without the authority of anyone entitled to grant it;

(5) To "falsely make" a written instrument means to make or draw a complete or incomplete written instrument which purports to be authentic, but which is not authentic either because the ostensible maker is fictitious or because, if real, he or she did not authorize the making or drawing thereof;

(6) "Forged instrument" means a written instrument which has been falsely made, completed, or altered;

(7) "Written instrument" means: (a) Any paper, document, or other instrument containing written or printed matter or its equivalent; or (b) any access device, token, stamp, seal, badge, trademark, or other evidence or symbol of value, right, privilege, or identification.

[2011 c 336 s 381; 1999 c 143 s 38; 1987 c 140 s 5; 1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 38 s 12; 1975 1st ex.s. c 260 s 9A.60.010.]

NOTES:

Reviser's note: The definitions in this section have been alphabetized pursuant to RCW 1.08.015(2)(k).

Effective date—Severability—1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 38: See notes following RCW 9A.08.020.